Arkansas, session 2025, HB1445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 2, establishes that "All
men are created equally free and independent, and have certain inherent and
inalienable rights; amongst which are those of enjoying and defending life
and liberty; of acquiring, possessing and protecting property, and
reputation; and of pursuing their own happiness";
(2) Furthermore, Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 21,
establishes that "No person shall be taken, or imprisoned, or disseized of
his estate, freehold, liberties or privileges; or outlawed, or in any manner
destroyed, or deprived of his life, liberty or property; except by the
judgment of his peers, or the law of the land; nor shall any person, under
any circumstances, be exiled from the State";
(3) Arkansans have a constitutional right to use their property
without intrusion by the government;
(4) Short-term rentals are vital to the tourism and
marketability of the state; and
*JLL062*
02/10/2025 2:59:21 PM JLL062

HB1445
(5) Local governments often hold back tourism and infringe on
property owners' private property rights in this state by passing ordinances
that inhibit property owners' right to use their property as they see fit.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 11, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-11-111. Restrictions on regulation of short-term rentals and
vacation rentals — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Applicant" means:
(A) A short-term rental owner; or
(B) An assigned agent who plans to manage a short-term
rental;
(2) "Local government" means an incorporated town, a city, or a
county;
(3) "Effectively prohibit" means an act or failure to act by the
governing body of a local government that prevents a property owner, lodging
operator, or tenant from using property as a short-term rental after
reasonable compliance with generally applicable local laws;
(4)(A) "Short-term rental" means an individually or collectively
owned single-family house or dwelling unit or a unit or group of units in a
condominium, cooperative or timeshare, or owner-occupied residential home
that is offered for rental for a fee and for thirty (30) days or less.
(B) "Short-term rental" does not include a unit that is
used:
(i) For retail;
(ii) As a restaurant;
(iii) As banquet space;
(iv) As an event center; or
(v) For any other similar use; and
(5) "Short-term rental marketplace" means a person who provides
a platform through which a property owner, lodging operator, or tenant, or
the authorized agent of the property owner, lodging operator, or tenant,
offers a short-term rental to an occupant.
(b) A local government shall not enact or enforce an ordinance,
resolution, rule, or other requirement of any type that prohibits,
02/10/2025 2:59:21 PM JLL062

HB1445
effectively prohibits, or limits the use of a property as a short-term rental
unit.
(c) A local government may enact or enforce an ordinance, resolution,
rule, or other requirement that:
(1)(A) Requires an applicant to register with the local
government, at a cost not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per short-term
rental, prior to the applicant's operation of a short-term rental, provided
that the ordinance, resolution, rule, or other requirement does not expressly
prohibit, effectively prohibit, or limit the use of a property as a short-
term rental.
(B) If a local government enacts or enforces an ordinance,
resolution, rule, or other requirement under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this
section, the local government shall:
(i) Review an application for registration for
completeness within fifteen (15) business days after receiving the
application for registration; and
(ii) Accept the application for registration or
issue a written notice of denial of the application for registration that
identifies the deficiencies in the application for registration.
(C) An applicant that receives a written notice of denial
of the applicant’s application for registration under subdivision
(c)(1)(B)(ii) of this section shall not be prohibited from submitting another
application for registration if the applicant cures the deficiencies
identified in the written notice of denial of the application for
registration;
(2) Is not more burdensome than an ordinance, resolution, rule,
or other requirement that currently applies to all residential properties
found within the jurisdiction of the local government;
(3) Suspends an applicant's ability to operate a short-term
rental for a period of time that does not exceed thirty (30) days if the
applicant has been adjudicated of violating the same local ordinance three
(3) or more times within a one hundred eighty (180) day period of time;
(4) Suspends an applicant's ability to operate a short-term
rental for a period of time that does not exceed twelve (12) months if the
applicant has been found guilty of violating one (1) local ordinance and the
violation of the local ordinance:
02/10/2025 2:59:21 PM JLL062

HB1445
(A) Occurred at the short-term rental; and
(B) Resulted in the serious physical injury or wrongful
death of a person from the purposely reckless conduct of the short-term
rental owner or the short-term rental owner's assigned agent; or
(5) Limits or prohibits the use of a short-term rental to:
(A) House sex offenders;
(B) Sell illegal drugs or alcohol; or
(C) House an adult-oriented business, including without
limitation a business involving:
(i) Pornography or other obscene material; or
(ii) Nude or topless dancing.
(d) A short-term rental:
(1) Shall be classified as residential land use for zoning
purposes; and
(2) Is subject to all zoning requirements applicable to property
classified as residential land use for zoning purposes.
(e) A local government shall not regulate the operation of a short-
term rental marketplace.


















02/10/2025 2:59:21 PM JLL062